Arkansas, session 2025, HB1668.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 16, is amended to add an additional
chapter to read as follows:
CHAPTER 132
VULNERABLE YOUTH PROTECTION ACT

16-132-101. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Vulnerable Youth
Protection Act".

16-132-102. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)(A) "Castration, sterilization, or mutilation" means any of
the procedures or treatments prohibited under § 20-9-1501 et seq., regardless
*JMB140*
03-19-2025 15:05:26 JMB140

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1668
of who performs or provides the procedures or treatments.
(B) "Castration, sterilization, or mutilation" does not
include any of the conduct described in § 20-9-1502(c);
(2) "Minor" means an individual who is younger than
eighteen (18) years of age; and
(3) "Social transitioning" means any act by which a minor adopts
or espouses a gender identity that differs from the minor’s biological sex as
determined by the sex organs, chromosomes, and endogenous profiles of the
minor, including without limitation changes in clothing, pronouns, hairstyle,
and name.

16-132-103. Civil action — Liability.
(a)(1) Any person who knowingly causes or contributes to the social
transitioning of a minor or the castration, sterilization, or mutilation of a
minor shall be strictly and jointly and severally liable to the minor and the
minor’s parents for any personal injuries or harm resulting from the social
transitioning or the castration, sterilization, or mutilation of the minor.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law, a person shall not be held
liable under this chapter for any speech or conduct protected by the First
Amendment of the United States Constitution, as made applicable to the states
through the Supreme Court of the United States’ interpretations of the
Fourteenth Amendment of the United States Constitution, or by Article 2, § 6
of the Arkansas Constitution.
(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a person may bring an action under
this chapter not later than twenty (20) years after the date that the cause
of action accrues.
(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a civil action under this chapter
shall not be brought against any person that acted at the behest of federal
agencies, contractors, or employees that are carrying out duties under
federal law, if the imposition of liability upon that person would violate
the doctrines of preemption or intergovernmental immunity.
(d) Notwithstanding any other law or rule, including Arkansas Rule of
Civil Procedure 23, a civil action under this chapter shall not be litigated
on behalf of a plaintiff class or a defendant class, and a court shall not
certify a class under Arkansas Rule of Civil Procedure 23 in any civil action
brought under this section.
03-19-2025 15:05:26 JMB140

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1668
(e) Any waiver or purported waiver of the right to sue under this
chapter shall be void as against public policy and shall not be enforceable
in any court.

16-132-104. Recovery.
A person who prevails in a suit brought under this chapter shall be
entitled to recover:
(1) Nominal damages;
(2) Compensatory damages;
(3) Statutory damages in an amount of not less than ten thousand
dollars ($10,000) from each defendant, in addition to any compensatory
damages that may be awarded;
(4) Punitive damages in an amount of not less than ten million
dollars ($10,000,000) from each defendant if irreversible sterilization or
sexual dysfunction results, in addition to any compensatory damages that may
be awarded; and
(5) Court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

16-132-105. Affirmative defenses.
It is an affirmative defense under this chapter that:
(1) The imposition of liability on the defendant will violate
constitutional or federally protected rights that belong to the defendant
personally; or
(2) The defendant:
(A) Has standing to assert the rights of a third party
under the tests for third-party standing established by the United States
Supreme Court; and
(B) Demonstrates that the imposition of liability on the
defendant will violate constitutional or federally protected rights belonging
to the third party.

16-132-106. Void defenses.
Notwithstanding any other law, the following are not a defense to an
action brought under this chapter:
(1) Ignorance or mistake of law;
(2) A defendant’s belief that the requirements or provisions of
03-19-2025 15:05:26 JMB140

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1668
this chapter are unconstitutional or were unconstitutional;
(3) A defendant’s reliance on any court decision that has been
vacated, reversed, or overruled on appeal or by a subsequent court, even if
that court decision had not been vacated, reversed, or overruled when the
conduct occurred;
(4) A defendant’s reliance on any state or federal court
decision that is not binding on the court in which the action has been
brought;
(5) A defendant's reliance on any federal statute, agency rule
or action, or treaty that has been repealed, superseded, or declared invalid
or unconstitutional, even if that federal statute, agency rule or action, or
treaty had not been repealed, superseded, or declared invalid or
unconstitutional when the conduct described in § 16-132-103 occurred;
(6) A nonmutual issue preclusion or nonmutual claim preclusion;
(7) The consent of the plaintiff to the defendant’s conduct;
(8) The consent of the minor who was castrated, sterilized,
mutilated, or socially transitioned to the defendant’s conduct;
(9) Contributory or comparative negligence;
(10) Assumption of risk;
(11) Lack of but-for or proximate causation;
(12) Governmental immunity, official immunity, or qualified
immunity;
(13) The plaintiff’s waiver or purported waiver of his or her
right to sue under this chapter;
(14) The plaintiff’s failure to exhaust administrative remedies;
or
(15) A claim that the enforcement of this chapter or the
imposition of civil liability against the defendant will violate the
constitutional rights of third parties, except as provided under §16-132-
103(a)(2).

16-132-107. Enforcement as private civil action.
(a)(1) Notwithstanding any other law, this chapter shall be enforced
exclusively through the private civil action in § 16-132-103.
(2) A direct or indirect enforcement of this chapter shall not
be taken or threatened by the state, a political subdivision, a district or
03-19-2025 15:05:26 JMB140

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1668
county attorney, or any officer or employee of this state or a political
subdivision against any person or entity, by any means whatsoever, except
through the private civil action in § 16-132-103.
(b) The state, a political subdivision of the state, a district or
county attorney, or any officer or employee of this state or a political
subdivision shall not:
(1) Use the conduct described under § 16-132-103 to justify or
trigger the enforcement of any other law or any type of adverse consequence
under any other law, except through the private civil action under § 16-132-
103;
(2) Act in concert or participate with another person who brings
suit under this chapter;
(3) Establish or attempt to establish any type of agency or
fiduciary relationship with another person who brings suit under this
chapter;
(4) Make any attempt to control or influence another person's
decision to bring suit under this chapter or that person's conduct of the
litigation; or
(5)(A) Intervene in any action brought under this chapter.
(B) Subdivision (b)(5)(A) of this section does not
prohibit the state, a political subdivision of the state, a district or
county attorney, or any officer or employee of this state or a political
subdivision from filing an amicus curiae brief in the action if the state, a
political subdivision of the state, a district or county attorney, or any
officer or employee of this state or a political subdivision does not act in
concert or participate with the plaintiff.
(c) Notwithstanding any other law, this section does not preclude or
limit the enforcement of any other law or rule against conduct that is
independently prohibited by such other law or rule, and that would remain
prohibited by such other law or rule in the absence of this chapter.
(d) Notwithstanding any other law, a private civil action brought
under this chapter is not subject to the Citizen Participation in Government
Act, § 16-63-501 et seq., or the Religious Freedom Restoration Act, § 16-123-
401 et seq.

16-132-108. Immunity.
03-19-2025 15:05:26 JMB140

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1668
(a) Notwithstanding any other law and except as provided in subsection
(b) of this section, in any action, claim, counterclaim, or any type of legal
or equitable action that challenges the validity or enforceability of any
provision or application of this subchapter, on constitutional grounds or
otherwise, or that seeks to prevent or enjoin the state, its political
subdivisions, or any officer, employee, or agent of this state or a political
subdivision from enforcing any provision or application of this chapter, or
from hearing, adjudicating, or docketing a civil action brought under this
chapter:
(1) The state and each of its officers and employees shall have
sovereign immunity;
(2) The political subdivisions of the state and each of their
officers and employees shall have governmental immunity; and
(3) Each officer and employee of this state or a political
subdivision shall have official immunity and qualified immunity.
(b) The sovereign immunity provided under subsection (a)(1) of this
section includes the constitutional sovereign immunity recognized by the
United States Supreme Court in Seminole Tribe of Florida v. Florida, 517 U.S.
44 (1996), and Alden v. Maine, 527 U.S. 706 (1999), which applies in both
state and federal court, and which may not be abrogated by the United States
Congress or by any state or federal court except pursuant to legislation
authorized by Section 5 of the Fourteenth Amendment, by the Bankruptcy Clause
of Article I of the United States Constitution, by Congress’s powers to raise
and support Armies and to provide and maintain a Navy, or by any other
constitutional provision that might be recognized by the United States
Supreme Court as a basis for authorizing the United States Congress to
abrogate state sovereign immunity.
(c) The immunities provided under subsection (a) of this section shall
apply in every court, both state and federal, and in every adjudicative
proceeding of any type whatsoever.
(d) State law shall not waive or abrogate an immunity provided under
subsection (a) of this section unless the state law expressly waives or
abrogates immunity with specific reference to this section.
(e) An attorney representing the state, its political subdivisions, or
any officer, employee, or agent of this state or a political subdivision
shall not:
03-19-2025 15:05:26 JMB140

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1668
(1) Waive an immunity provided under subsection (a) of this
section; or
(2)(A) Take any action that would result in a waiver of the
immunity provided under subsection (a) of this section.
(B) Any action or purported waiver made in violation of
subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this section shall be regarded as a legal nullity
and an ultra vires act.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, including § 16-111-101 et seq., and
§ 16-115-102, a court of this state shall not :
(1) Award declaratory or injunctive relief, or any type of writ,
including a writ of prohibition, that would pronounce any provision or
application of this chapter invalid or unconstitutional, or that would
restrain or prevent the state or a political subdivision of the state, any
officer, employee, or agent of this state or a political subdivision, or any
person from enforcing any provision or application of this chapter, or from
hearing, adjudicating, docketing, or filing a civil action brought under this
chapter; or
(2) Have jurisdiction to consider any action, claim, or
counterclaim that seeks the relief as described in subdivision (f)(1) of this
section.
(g)(1) An action, claim, or counterclaim that seeks the relief
described in subsection (f) of this section shall not be litigated on behalf
of a plaintiff or defendant class, notwithstanding Arkansas Rule of Civil
Procedure 23.
(2) A court shall not certify a plaintiff or defendant class in
any action seeking the relief described in subsection (f) of this section.

16-132-109. Fee shifting.
(a) Any person, including an entity, attorney, or law firm, who seeks
declaratory or injunctive relief to prevent this state, its political
subdivision, any officer or employee of the state or a political subdivision
of the state, or any person from enforcing or bringing suit to enforce any
provision of this chapter, in a state or federal court, or that represents a
litigant seeking such relief in any state or federal court, is jointly and
severally liable to pay the costs and reasonable attorney’s fees of the
prevailing party, including the costs and reasonable attorney’s fees that the
03-19-2025 15:05:26 JMB140

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1668
prevailing party incurs in the prevailing party's efforts to recover costs
and fees.
(b) For purposes of this section, a party is considered a prevailing
party if:
(1) A state or federal court dismisses any claim or cause of
action brought against the party by the litigant that seeks the declaratory
or injunctive relief described by subsection (a) of this section, regardless
of the reason for the dismissal;
(2) A state or federal court enters judgment in the party's
favor on any such claim or cause of action; or
(3) The party that seeks the declaratory or injunctive relief
described by subsection (a) of this section voluntarily dismisses or nonsuits
the party's claims against the other party under Fed. R. Civ. P. 41, Ark. R.
Civ. P. 41, or any other source of law.
(c) A prevailing party may recover costs and attorney’s fees under
this section only to the extent that those costs and attorney’s fees were
incurred while defending claims or causes of action on which the party
prevailed.
(d) Regardless of whether a prevailing party sought to recover costs
or attorney's fees in the underlying action, a prevailing party under this
section may bring a civil action to recover costs and attorney's fees against
a person, including an entity, attorney, or law firm, that sought declaratory
or injunctive relief as described in subsection (a) of this section no later
than three (3) years from the date on which:
(1) The dismissal or judgment described by subsection (b) of
this section becomes final on the conclusion of appellate review; or
(2) The time for seeking appellate review expires.
(e) It is not a defense to an action brought under subsection (d) of
this section that:
(1) A prevailing party under this section failed to seek
recovery of costs or attorney's fees in the underlying action;
(2) The court in the underlying action declined to recognize or
enforce the requirements of this section; or
(3) The court in the underlying action held that any provisions
of this section are invalid, unconstitutional, or preempted by federal law,
notwithstanding the doctrines of issue or claim preclusion.
03-19-2025 15:05:26 JMB140

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1668
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, including § 16-60-101 et seq., a
civil action brought under subsection (d) of this section may be brought in:
(1) The county in which all or a substantial part of the events
or omissions giving rise to the claim occurred;
(2) The county of residence for any one of the natural person
defendants at the time the cause of action accrued;
(3) The county of the principal office in this state of any one
of the defendants that is not a natural person; or
(4) The county of residence for the claimant if the claimant is
a natural person residing in this state.
(g) If a civil action is brought under subsection (d) of this section
in any one of the venues described by subsection (f) of this section, then
the action may not be transferred to a different venue without the written
consent of all parties.
(h) Any contractual choice of forum provision that purports to require
a civil action under subsection (d) of this section to be litigated in
another forum shall be void as against public policy and may not be enforced
in any state or federal court.

16-132-110. Applicability.
(a)(1) Notwithstanding any other law, this chapter and the law of this
state shall apply to any social transitioning of a minor resident of this
state, and to any castration, sterilization, or mutilation of a minor who is
a resident of this state, regardless of where that treatment occurred, and to
any civil action brought under this chapter, to the maximum extent permitted
by federal law and state law.
(2) Any contractual choice-of-law provision that purports to
re2q8u ire the law of a different jurisdiction to apply shall be void as against
pu2b9l ic policy and shall not be enforced in any court.
(b) This chapter shall apply extraterritorially to the maximum extent
permitted by the United States Constitution and the Arkansas Constitution.
(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a court of this state shall have
personal jurisdiction over a defendant sued under this chapter to the maximum
extent permitted by the Fourteenth Amendment to the United States
Constitution.
(d) This chapter does not limit or preclude a defendant from asserting
03-19-2025 15:05:26 JMB140

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1668
the unconstitutionality of any provision or application of state law as a
defense to liability under this chapter or from asserting any other defense
that might be available under any other source of law.

16-132-111. Severability.
(a) Under Leavitt v. Jane L., 518 U.S. 137 (1996), in which in the
context of determining the severability of a state statute the United States
Supreme Court held that an explicit statement of legislative intent is
controlling, it is the intent of the General Assembly that every provision,
section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or word in this chapter, and
every application of this chapter to every person, group of persons, or
circumstances, are severable from each other.
(b)(1) If any application of a provision of this chapter to any
person, group of persons, or circumstances is found by a court to be invalid,
preempted, or unconstitutional, for any reason whatsoever, then the remaining
applications of that provision of this chapter to all other persons and
circumstances shall be severed and preserved and shall remain in effect.
(2) All constitutionally valid applications of the provisions in
this chapter shall be severed from any applications that a court finds to be
invalid, preempted, or unconstitutional, because it is the intent of the
General Assembly and priority that every single valid application of every
statutory provision be allowed to stand alone.
(c) The General Assembly further declares that it would have enacted
this chapter, and each provision and all constitutional applications of the
provisions of this chapter, irrespective of the fact that any provision of
this chapter were to be declared invalid, preempted, or unconstitutional.
(d) If any provision of this chapter is found by a court to be
unconstitutionally vague, then the applications of that provision that do not
present constitutional vagueness problems shall be severed and remain in
force, consistent with the severability requirements of subsections (a)
through (c) of this section.
(e)(1) A court shall not decline to enforce the severability
requirements of subsections (a) through (d) of this section on the ground
that severance would rewrite the statute or involve the court in legislative
or lawmaking activity.
(2) A court that declines to enforce or enjoins a state official
03-19-2025 15:05:26 JMB140

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1668
from enforcing a statutory provision does not rewrite a statute or engaging
in legislative or lawmaking activity, as the statute continues to contain the
same words as before the court's decision.
(3) A judicial injunction or declaration of unconstitutionality:
(A) Is nothing more than an edict prohibiting enforcement
of the disputed statute against the named parties to that lawsuit, which may
subsequently be vacated by a later court if that court has a different
understanding of the requirements of the Arkansas Constitution or the United
States Constitution;
(B) Is not a formal amendment of the language in a
statute; and
(C) No more rewrites a statute than a decision by the
executive not to enforce a duly enacted statute in a limited and defined set
of circumstances.
(f) If any state or federal court disregards any of the severability
requirements in subsections (a) through (e) of this section, and declares or
finds any provision of this subchapter facially invalid, preempted, or
unconstitutional, when there are discrete applications of that provision that
can be enforced against a person, group of persons, or circumstances without
violating federal law or the federal or state constitutions, then that
provision shall be interpreted, as a matter of state law, as if the
legislature had enacted a provision limited to the persons, group of persons,
or circumstances for which the provision's application will not violate
federal law or the federal or state constitutions, and every court shall
adopt this saving construction of that provision until the court ruling that
pronounced the provision facially invalid, preempted, or unconstitutional is
vacated or overruled.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. SEVERABILITY CLAUSE. If any provision of
this act or the application of this act to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of
this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end, the provisions of this act are declared
severable.

/s/Bentley
03-19-2025 15:05:26 JMB140